da: Kompatibelt instrument: Harmonika; Akustisk guitar; Althorn; Altsaxofon; Banjo; Barytonhorn; Barytonsaxofon; Stortromme; Basguitar; Bastrombon; Fagot; Bongo; Signalhorn; Cello; Klarinet; Conga-tromme; Kornet; Koklokke; Bækken; Digitalt blæseinstrument; Kontrabas; Tromme; Elektrisk guitar; Eufonium; Gulvtromme; Flugelhorn; Fløjte; Alpehorn; Gongtromme; Guitar; Håndklokke; Harmonika; Harpe; Keyboard; Mandolin; Marchbaryton; Mellofon; Obo; Octoban; Orgel; Piano; Piccolotrompet; Rototom; Saxofon; Lilletromme; Sousafon; Synthesizer; Tenorhorn; Tenorsaxofon; Timbaler; Tamtam; Basun; Trompet; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Violin; Wagnertuba; Xylofon; Andet
hr-HR: Kompatibilno glazbalo: Harmonika; Akustična gitara; Alt-rog; Alt-saksofon; Bendžo; Bariton-rog; Bariton-saksofoni; Bas-bubanj; Bas-gitara; Bas-trombon; Fagot; Bongo; Vojnička truba; Violončelo; Klarinet; Conga bubanj; Kornet; Zvono; Činele; Digitalni puhački instrument; Kontrabas; Bubanj; Električna gitara; Eufonij; Floor tom bubanj; Krilnica; Flauta; Francuski rog; Gong bubanj; Gitara; Ručno zvono; Harmonika; Harfa; Klavijatura; Mandolina; Maršing bariton; Melofon; Oboa; Oktobani; Orgulje; Klavir; Piccolo truba; Rototom; Saksofon; Mali bubanj; Suzafon; Sintesajzer; Tenor-rog; Tenor-saksofon; Timbal; Tom-tom bubanj; Trombon; Truba; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Violina; Wagnerova tuba; Ksilofon; Ostalo
de: Kompatibles Instrument: Akkordeon; Akustikgitarre; Althorn; Alt-Saxophon; Banjo; Baritonhorn; Baritonsaxophon; Bassdrum; Bassgitarre; Bassposaune; Fagott; Bongo; Horn; Cello; Klarinette; Conga-Trommel; Kornett; Kuhglocken; Becken; Digitales Blasinstrument; Kontrabass; Trommel; Elektrische Gitarre; Euphonium; Bodentom; Flügelhorn; Querflöte; Waldhorn; Gongtrommel; Gitarre; Handglocke; Mundharmonika; Harfe; Keyboard; Mandolin; Marschbariton; Mellophon; Oboe; Oktoban; Orgel; Piano; Piccolo-Trompete; Rototom; Saxophon; Snaredrum; Sousaphon; Synthesizer; Tenorhorn; Tenorsaxophon; Timbales; Tomtoms; Posaune; Trumpet; Tuba; Ukulele; Bratsche; Geige; Wagner-Tuba; Xylophon; Sonstiges
sv: Kompatibelt instrument: Dragspel; Akustisk gitarr; Althorn; Altsaxofon; Banjo; Barytonhorn; Barytonsaxofon; Bastrumma; Basgitarr; Bastrombon; Fagott; Bongo; Bygelhorn; Cello; Klarinett; Congatrumma; Kornett; Koskälla; Cymbal; Digitalt blåsinstrument; Kontrabas; Trumma; Elgitarr; Eufonium; Golvpuka; Flygelhorn; Flöjt; Valthorn; Gong-trumma; Gitarr; Handklocka; Munspel; Harpa; Keyboard; Mandolin; Marschbaryton; Mellofon; Oboe; Octoban; Orgel; Piano; Piccolotrumpet; Rototom; Saxofon; Virveltrumma; Sousafon; Synthesizer; Tenorhorn; Tenorsaxofon; Timbales; Puka; Trombon; Trumpet; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Violin; Wagnertuba; Xylofon; Annat
hu: Kompatibilis hangszer: Tangóharmonika; Akusztikus gitár; Altkürt; Altszaxofon; Bendzsó; Baritonkürt; Baritonszaxofon; Basszusdob; Basszusgitár; Basszusharsona; Fagott; Bongó; Kürt; Cselló; Klarinét; Kongadob; Kornett; Kolomp; Cintányér; Digitális fúvós hangszer; Nagybőgő; Dob; Elektromos gitár; Baritontuba; Álló tam; Szárnykürt; Fuvola; Francia kürt; Gong; Gitár; Kézi csengő; Harmonika; Hárfa; Keyboard; Mandolin; Bariton menetkürt; Mellofon; Oboa; Oktobán; Orgona; Zongora; Pikoló trombita; Rototom; Szaxofon; Pergődob; Szouszafon; Szintetizátor; Tenorkürt; Tenorszaxofon; Üstdob; Tom-tom; Harsona; Trombita; Tuba; Ukulele; Brácsa; Hegedű; Wagner-tuba; Xilofon; Egyéb
ko: 호환 가능한 악기: 아코디언; 어쿠스틱 기타; 알토 호른; 알토 색소폰; 밴조; 바리톤 호른; 바리톤 색소폰; 베이스 드럼; 베이스 기타; 베이스 트롬본; 바순; 봉고; 나팔; 첼로; 클라리넷; 콩가 드럼; 코넷; 카우벨; 심벌; 디지털 관악기; 더블베이스; 드럼; 일렉트릭 기타; 유포니엄; 플로어 톰; 플뤼겔호른; 플루트; 프렌치 호른; 징 드럼; 기타; 핸드벨; 하모니카; 하프; 키보드; 만돌린; 마칭 바리톤; 멜로폰; 오보에; 옥토반; 오르간; 피아노; 피콜로 트럼펫; 로토톰; 색소폰; 스네어 드럼; 수자폰; 신디사이저; 테너 호른; 테너 색소폰; 팀발레스; 톰톰; 트롬본; 트럼펫; 튜바; 우쿨렐레; 비올라; 바이올린; 바그너 튜바; 실로폰; 기타
el: Συμβατό μουσικό όργανο: Ακορντεόν; Ακουστική κιθάρα; Αλτικόρνο; Άλτο σαξόφωνο; Μπάντζο; Βαθύφωνο κόρνο; Βαθύφωνο σαξόφωνο; Γκρανκάσα; Μπάσο; Μπάσο τρομπόνι; Φαγκότο; Μπόνγκο; Σάλπιγγα; Τσέλο; Κλαρινέτο; Τύμπανο κόνγκα; Κορνέτα; Κουδούνα; Κύμβαλο; Ψηφιακό πνευστό όργανο; Διπλό μπάσο; Τάμπουρο; Ηλεκτρική κιθάρα; Ευφώνιο; Floor tom; Οξύφωνο κόρνο; Φλάουτο; Γαλλικό κόρνο; Τύμπανο γκονγκ; Κιθάρα; Κουδουνάκι χειρός; Φυσαρμόνικα; Άρπα; Αρμόνιο; Μαντολίνο; Βαρύτονο παρέλασης; Μελόφωνο; Όμποε; Octoban; Εκκλησιαστικό όργανο; Πιάνο; Τρομπέτα Piccolo; Rototom; Σαξόφωνο; Ταμπούρο; Σουζάφωνο; Συνθεσάιζερ; Υψίφωνο κόρνο; Υψίφωνο σαξόφωνο; Τεμπάλ; Τομ-τομ; Τρομπόνι; Τρομπέτα; Τούμπα; Γιουκαλίλι; Βιόλα; Βιολί; Τούμπα Wagner; Ξυλόφωνο; Άλλο
en: Compatible instrument: Accordion; Acoustic guitar; Alto horn; Alto saxophone; Banjo; Baritone horn; Baritone saxophone; Bass drum; Bass guitar; Bass trombone; Bassoon; Bongo; Bugle; Cello; Clarinet; Conga drum; Cornet; Cowbell; Cymbal; Digital wind instrument; Double bass; Drum; Electric guitar; Euphonium; Floor tom; Flugel horn; Flute; French horn; Gong drum; Guitar; Hand bell; Harmonica; Harp; Keyboard; Mandolin; Marching baritone; Mellophone; Oboe; Octoban; Organ; Piano; Piccolo trumpet; Rototom; Saxophone; Snare drum; Sousaphone; Synthesizer; Tenor horn; Tenor saxophone; Timbales; Tom-tom; Trombone; Trumpet; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Violin; Wagner tuba; Xylophone; Other
bg-BG: Съвместим инструмент: Акордеон; Акустична китара; Алт валдхорна; Алт саксофон; Банджо; Баритон валдхорна; Баритон саксофон; Басов барабан; Бас китара; Бас тромбон; Фагот; Бонго; Ловджийски рог; Виолончело; Кларинет; Конга барабан; Корнет; Пастирски звънец; Цимбал; Цифров духов инструмент; Контрабас; Барабан; Електрическа китара; Еуфониум; Барабан „Floor tom“; Флигорна; Флейта; Френска валдхорна; Гонг; Китара; Ръчно звънче; Хармоника; Арфа; Клавир; Мандолина; Баритон; Мелофон; Обой; Октобан; Орган; Пиано; Пиколо тромпет; Рототом; Саксофон; Малък барабан; Сусафон; Синтезатор; Тенор валдхорна; Тенор саксофон; Тимбали; Том-том; Тромбон; Тромпет; Туба; Укулеле; Виола; Цигулка; Вагнерова туба; Ксилофон; Други
nb: Kompatibelt instrument: Trekkspill; Akustisk gitar; Althorn; Altsaksofon; Banjo; Baritonhorn; Baritonsaksofon; Basstromme; Bassgitar; Basstrombone; Fagott; Bongo; Bugle; Cello; Klarinett; Congatromme; Kornett; Kubjelle; Cymbal; Digitalt vindinstrumenter; Kontrabass; Tromme; Elektrisk gitar; Eufonium; Stortromme; Flugelhorn; Fløyte; Valthorn; Gongtromme; Gitar; Håndbjelle; Munnspill; Harpe; Tastatur; Mandolin; Marsjerende baryton; Mellofon; Obo; Oktoban; Organ; Piano; Piccolotrompet; Rototom; Saksofon; Skarptromme; Sousafon; Synthesizer; Tenorhorn; Tenorsaksofon; Timbaler; Tom-tom; Trombone; Trompet; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Fiolin; Wagner-tuba; Xylofon; Annen
cs: Kompatibilní nástroj: Akordeon; Akustická kytara; Altový lesní roh; Altsaxofon; Bendžo; Barytonový lesní roh; Barytonsaxofon; Basový buben; Baskytara; Basový trombon; Fagot; Bongo; Trubka; Violoncello; Klarinet; Konga; Kornet; Kravský zvonec; Činel; Digitální dechový nástroj; Kontrabas; Buben; Elektrická kytara; Eufonyum; Podlahový tom; Křídlovka; Flétna; Lesní roh; Gongový buben; Kytara; Ruční zvonek; Harmonika; Harfa; Klávesnice; Mandolína; Pochodový baryton; Melofon; Hoboj; Oktoban; Varhany; Klavír; Malá trumpetka; Rototom; Saxofon; Snare buben; Suzafon; Syntezátor; Tenorový roh; Tenorsaxofon; Tympány; Tomtom; Pozoun; Trubka; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Housle; Wagnerova tuba; Xylofon; Jiné
ro-RO: Instrument compatibil: Acordeon; Chitară acustică; Corn alto; Saxofon alto; Banjo; Corn bariton; Saxofon bariton; Tobă bas; Chitară bas; Trombon bas; Fagot; Bongo; Goarnă; Violoncel; Clarinet; Tobă conga; Cornet; Talangă; Chimval; Instrument digital de suflat; Contrabas; Tobă; Chitară electrică; Eufoniu; Tobă cazan; Fligorn; Flaut; Corn francez; Tobă gong; Chitară; Clopot de mână; Muzicuță; Harpă; Tastatură; Mandolină; Bariton de marș; Melofon; Oboi; Octoban; Organ; Pian; Trompetă piccolo; Rototom; Saxofon; Tobă „snare”; Susafon; Sintetizator; Corn tenor; Saxofon tenor; Timpan; Tom-tom; Trombon; Trompetă; Tubă; Ukulele; Violă; Vioară; Tubă wagner; Xilofon; Altele
sk-SK: Kompatibilný nástroj: Akordeón; Akustická gitara; Altový roh; Alt saxofón; Banjo; Barytónový roh; Barytónový saxofón; Basový bubon; Basgitara; Basový trombón; Fagot; Bongo; Poľnica; Cello; Klarinet; Conga bubon; Kornet; Kravský zvonec; Cymbal; Digitálny dychový nástroj; Kontrabas; Bubon; Elektrická gitara; Eufónium; Bubon floor tom; Krídlovka; Flauta; Lesný roh; Gong; Gitara; Ručný zvonček; Harmonika; Harfa; Klávesy; Mandolína; Pochodový barytón; Melafón; Hoboj; Bubon Octoban; Organ; Klavír; Pikola; Rototom; Saxofón; Vírivý  bubon; Sousafón; Syntetizátor; Tenorový roh; Tenor saxofón; Timbales; Tom-tom; Trombón; Trúbka; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Husle; Wagnerova tuba; Xylofón; Iné
fr: Instrument compatible: Accordéon; Guitare acoustique; Cor alto; Saxophone alto; Banjo; Cor baryton; Saxophone baryton; Tambour de basse; Guitare basse; Trombone basse; Basson; Bongo; Bugle; Violoncelle; Clarinette; Conga; Cornet; Cloche de vache; Cymbale; Instrument à vent numérique; Contrebasse; Tambour; Guitare électrique; Euphonium; Tambour de sol; Cor de bugle; Flûte; Cor d’harmonie; Tambour Gong; Guitare; Cloche à main; Harmonica; Harpe; Clavier; Mandoline; Baryton de marche; Mellophone; Hautbois; Octoban; Orgue; Piano; Trompette piccolo; Rototom; Saxophone; Caisse claire; Sousaphone; Synthétiseur; Cor ténor; Saxophone ténor; Timbales; Tom-tom; Trombone; Trompette; Tuba; Ukulélé; Viola; Violon; Tuba wagnérien; Xylophone; Autre
it: Strumento compatibile: Fisarmonica; Chitarra acustica; Corno contralto; Sassofono contralto; Banjo; Corno baritono; Sassofono baritono; Grancassa; Chitarra basso; Trombone basso; Fagotto; Bongo; Corno; Violoncello; Clarinetto; Conga; Cornetta; Campanaccio; Piatto; Strumento a fiato digitale; Contrabbasso; Tamburo; Chitarra elettrica; Eufonio; Tom da pavimento; Flicorno soprano; Flauto; Corno a pistone; Gong; Chitarra; Campanella; Armonica; Arpa; Tastiera; Mandolino; Corno baritono da marcia; Mellofono; Oboe; Octoban; Organo; Piano; Tromba ottavina; Rototom; Sassofono; Tamburo chiaro; Sousafono; Sintetizzatore; Corno tenore; Sassofono tenore; Timbales; Tam-tam; Trombone; Tromba; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Violino; Tuba wagneriana; Xilofono; Altro
es: Instrumento compatible: Acordeón; Guitarra acústica; Cuerno alto; Saxofón alto; Banjo; Cuerno barítono; Saxofón barítono; Bombo; Bajos; Trombón bajo; Fagot; Bongo; Corneta natural; Violonchelo; Clarinete; Tambor de conga; Corneta; Cencerro; Platillo; Instrumento de viento digital; Contrabajo; Tambor; Guitarra eléctrica; Eufonio; Tom de piso; Cuerno de flugel; Flauta; Corno francés; Tambor de gong; Guitarra; Campana de mano; Harmonica; Arpa; Teclado; Mandolina; Bombardino barítono; Melófono; Oboe; Octobán; Organo; Piano; Trompeta piccolo; Rototom; Saxofón; Caja clara; Sousafono; Sintetizador; Cuerno tenor; Saxofón tenor; Timbales; Tambor tom-tom; Trombón; Trompeta; Tuba; Ukelele; Viola; Violín; Tuba wagner; Xilófono; Otros
lt-LT: Suderinamas instrumentas: Akordeonas; Akustinė gitara; Althornas; Alto saksofonas; Bandža; Baritono ragas; Baritono saksofonas; Bosinis būgnas; Bosinė gitara; Bosinis trombonas; Fagotas; Bongas; Trimitas; Violončelė; Klarnetas; Kongas; Kornetas; Karvės varpas; Lėkštė; Skaitmeninis pučiamasis instrumentas; Kontrabosas; Būgninis; Elektrinė gitara; Eufonija; Flortomas; Fliugelhornas; Fleita; Valtorna; Gongas; Gitara; Rankinis varpas; Lūpinė armonikėlė; Arfa; Klavišiniai; Mandolina; Marširavimo baritoninis pučiamasis instrumentas; Melofonas; Obojus; „Octoban“; Vargonai; Pianinas; Pikolo trimitas; Rotomas; Saksofonas; Solinukas; Suzafonas; Sintezatorius; Tenoro ragas; Tenoro saksofonas; Timbalai; Tomtomas; Trombonas; Trimitas; Tuba; Ukulėlė; Altas; Smuikas; Vagnerio tūba; Ksilofonas; Kita
zh-TW: 相容樂器: 手風琴; 原聲吉他; 中音號; 中音薩克斯風; 斑鳩琴; 細管上低音號; 上低音薩克斯風; 低音鼓; 電貝斯; 低音長號; 低音管; 邦哥鼓; 軍號; 大提琴; 單簧管; 康加鼓; 短號; 牛鈴; 鈸; 數位管弦樂器; 低音提琴; 鼓; 電吉他; 粗管上低音號; 落地鼓; 柔音號; 長笛; 法國號; 鑼鼓; 吉他; 搖鐘; 口琴; 豎琴; 鍵盤樂器; 曼陀林; 行進上低音號; 中音圓號; 雙簧管; 八音鼓; 管風琴; 鋼琴; 高音小號; 輪鼓; 薩克斯風; 一般小鼓; 蘇沙號; 合成器; 次中音號; 次中音薩克斯風; 天巴鼓; 筒鼓; 長號; 小號; 低音號; 尤克萊利琴; 中提琴; 小提琴; 華格納低音號; 木琴; 其他
zh-CN: 兼容仪器: 手风琴; 原声吉他; 中音号; 中音萨克斯管; 班卓琴; 上低音号; 上低音萨克斯管; 低音鼓; 低音吉他; 低音长号; 巴松管; 邦戈鼓; 军号; 大提琴; 单簧管; 康加鼓; 短号; 牛颈铃; 铙钹; 电吹管; 低音提琴; 鼓; 电吉他; 上低音号; 落地通鼓; 富鲁格号; 长笛; 圆号; 铜鼓; 吉他; 手铃; 口琴; 竖琴; 键盘; 曼陀林; 行进上低音号; 行进圆号; 双簧管; 八音板; 管风琴; 钢琴; 高音小号; 轮鼓; 萨克斯管; 军鼓; 苏萨大号; 合成器; 次中音号; 次中音萨克斯管; 提姆巴尔鼓; 筒鼓; 长号; 喇叭裙; 低音兼次中音大号; 尤克里里; 中提琴; 小提琴; 瓦格纳大号; 木琴; 其他
tr: Uyumlu enstrüman: Akordeon; Akustik gitar; Alto boru; Alto saksafon; Banjo; Bariton boru; Bariton saksafon; Bas davul; Bas gitar; Bas trombonu; Fagot; Bongo; Boru çalgı; Çello; Klarnet; Conga davulu; Kornet; Cowbell; Büyük zil; Dijital nefesli çalgı; Kontrbas; Davul; Elektro gitar; Euphonium; Floor tom; flugelhorn; Flüt; Fransız kornosu; Gong davulu; Gitar; El çanı; Mızıka; Arp; Klavye; Mandolin; Bando baritonu; Mellofon; Obua; Octoban; Org; Piyano; Pikolo trompet; Rototom; Saksafon; Trampet; Suzafon; Sentezleyici; Alto korno; Tenor saksafon; Timballer; Tamtam; Trombon; Trompet; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Keman; Wagner tuba; Ksilofon; Diğer
ru: Совместимый инструмент: Аккордеон; Акустическая гитара; Альтгорн; Альт-саксофон; Банджо; Баритон-горн; Баритон-саксофон; Бас-барабан; Бас-гитара; Бас-тромбон; Фагот; Бонго; Горн; Виолончель; Кларнет; Конга-барабан; Корнет; Колокольчик; Цимбал; Цифровой духовой инструмент; Контрабас; Барабан; Электрогитара; Эуфониум; Напольный том; Флюгель-горн; Флейта; Валторна; Гонг-барабан; Гитара; Колокольчик; Гармоника; Арфа; Клавиатура; Мандолина; Маршевый баритон; Меллофон; Гобой; Октобан; Орган; Фортепиано; Труба-пикколо; Рототом; Саксофон; Малый барабан; Сузафон; Синтезатор; Тенор-горн; Тенор-саксофон; Тимбалес; Том-том; Тромбон; Труба; Туба; Укулеле; Виола; Скрипка; Туба Вагнера; Ксилофон; Другое
nl: Compatibel instrument: Accordion; Akoestische gitaar; Alt; Altsaxofoon; Banjo; Bariton; Baritonsaxofoon; Bassdrum; Basgitaar; Bastrombone; Bassoon; Bongo; Klaroen; Cello; Klarinet; Conga; Kornet; Koebel; Cimbaal; Digitaal blaasinstrument; Contrabas; Drum; Elektrische gitaar; Euphonium; Vloertrommel; Bugel; Fluit; Hoorn; Gongdrum; Gitaar; Handbel; Harmonica; Harp; Keyboard; Mandoline; Fanfarebariton; Mellofoon; Hobo; Octoban; Orgel; Piano; Piccolotrompet; Rototom; Saxofoon; Snare drum; Sousafoon; Synthesizer; Tenorhoorn; Tenorsaxofoon; Timbales; Tom-tom; Trombone; Trompet; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Viool; Wagner-tuba; Xylofoon; Andere
fi: Yhteensopiva soitin: Harmonikka; Akustinen kitara; Alttotorvi; Alttosaksofoni; Banjo; Baritonitorvi; Baritonisaksofoni; Bassorumpu; Bassokitara; Bassopasuuna; Fagotti; Bongo; Metsästystorvi; Sello; Klarinetti; Congarumpu; Kornetti; Lehmänkello; Symbaali; Digitaalinen puhallinsoitin; Kontrabasso; Rumpu; Sähkökitara; Baritonitorvi; Lattia-tom-tom; Flyygelitorvi; Huilu; Yksinkertainen käyrätorvi; Gong-rumpu; Kitara; Käsikello; Huuliharppu; Harppu; Kosketinsoitin; Mandoliini; Marssibaritonitorvi; Mellofoni; Oboe; Oktobaani; Urut; Piano; Piccolotrumpetti; Rototomi; Saksofoni; Virvelirumpu; Sousafoni; Syntetisaattori; Tenoritorvi; Tenorisaksofoni; Timbaalit; Tom-tomit; Pasuuna; Trumpetti; Tuuba; Ukulele; Alttoviulu; Viulu; Wagner-tuuba; Ksylofoni; Muu
vi: Dụng cụ tương thích: Đàn xếp; Đàn guitar mộc; Kèn Alto; Kèn Alto saxophone; Đàn banjo; Kèn Baritone; Kèn Baritone saxophone; Trống bass; Đàn guitar bass; Kèn Bass trombone; Kèn fa-gốt; Trống bongo; Kèn Bugle; Đàn cello; Kèn clarinet; Trống conga; Kèn cocnê; Chuông bò; Chũm chọe; Dụng cụ kèn điện tử; Đàn double bass; Trống; Đàn guitar điện; Tuba; Trống tom bass; Kèn Flugel; Sáo; Kèn săn; Trống chiêng; Đàn guitar; Chuông tay; Kèn harmonica; Đàn hạc; Đàn phím; Đàn mandolin; Kèn Marching baritone; Kèn Mellophone; Kèn ô-boa; Octoban; Đàn organ; Đàn piano; Kèn piccolo; Bộ trống Rototom; Kèn saxophone; Trống lẫy; Kèn sousa; Bộ tổng hợp; Kèn tenor; Kèn Tenor saxophone; Bộ trống Timbales; Trống tom-tom; Kèn trombone; Kèn trumpet; Kèn tuba; Đàn ukulele; Đàn viola; Đàn violin; Kèn Tuba wagner; Mộc cầm; Khác
pt-BR: Instrumento compatível: Acordeão; Guitarra acústica; Tuba; Saxofone alto; Banjo; Barítono; Saxofone barítono; Bumbo; Baixo; Trombone baixo; Fagote; Bongo; Cornetim; Violoncelo; Clarinete; Tambor de conga; Corneta; Sinos; Prato; Instrumento de sopro digital; Contrabaixo; Tambor; Guitarra elétrica; Eufônio; Tom de piso; Fliscorne; Flauta; Trompa; Bumbo de gongo; Violão; Sino de mão; Harmônica; Harpa; Teclado; Bandolim; Barítono de marcha; Melofone; Oboé; Octoban; Órgão; Piano; Trompete flautim; Rototom; Saxofone; Caixeta clara; Sousafone; Sintetizador; Trompa alta; Saxofone tenor; Timbal; Timbalão; Trombone; Trompete; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Violino; Trompa wagneriana; Xilofone; Outro
pt-PT: Instrumento compatível: Acordeão; Guitarra acústica; Saxotrompa alto; Saxofone alto; Banjo; Saxotrompa barítono; Saxofone barítono; Bombo; Baixos; Trombone baixo; Fagote; Bongo; Cornetim; Violoncelo; Clarinete; Atabaque; Corneta; Chocalho; Prato; Instrumento de sopro digital; Contrabaixo; Tambor; Guitarra elétrica; Eufónio; Timbalão de chão; Fliscorne; Flauta; Trompa francesa; Gongo; Guitarra; Sinos de mão; Harmónica; Harpa; Teclado; Bandolim; Barítono de marcha; Melofone; Oboé; Octoban; Órgão; Piano; Trompete piccolo; Rototom; Saxofone; Tarola; Sousafone; Sintetizador; Saxotrompa tenor; Saxofone tenor; Timbales; Timbalão; Trombone; Trompete; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Violino; Tuba Wagner; Xilofone; Outro
ja: 使用可能な楽器: アコーディオン; アコースティックギター; アルトホルン; アルトサックス; バンジョー; バリトンホルン; バリトンサックス; バスドラム; ベースギター; バストロンボーン; バスーン; ボンゴ; ビューグル; チェロ; クラリネット; コンガドラム; コルネット; カウベル; シンバル; デジタル管楽器; コントラバス; ドラム; エレキギター; ユーフォニアム; フロアタム; フリューゲルホルン; フルート; フレンチホルン; ゴングドラム; ギター; ハンドベル; ハーモニカ; ハープ; キーボード; マンドリン; マーチングバリトン; メロフォン; オーボエ; オクトバン; オルガン; ピアノ; ピッコロトランペット; ロートタム; サクソフォン; スネアドラム; スーザフォン; シンセサイザー; テナーホルン; テナーサックス; ティンバレス; トムトム; トロンボーン; トランペット; チューバ; ウクレレ; ビオラ; ヴァイオリン; ワーグナーチューバ; 木琴; その他
pl: Kompatybilny instrument: Akordeon; Gitara akustyczna; Róg altowy; Saksofon altowy; Bandżo; Róg barytonowy; Saksofon barytonowy; Bęben basowy; Gitara basowa; Puzon basowy; Fagot; Bongo; Dąbrówka; Wiolonczela; Klarnet; Bęben kongijski; Kornet; Dzwonek krowi; Talerze perkusyjne; Cyfrowy instrument dęty; Kontrabas; Bęben; Gitara elektryczna; Eufonium; Tom podłogowy; Róg flugla; Flet; Waltornia; Bęben gongowy; Gitara; Dzwonek ręczny; Harmonijka ustna; Harfa; Klawiatura; Mandolina; Marszowy baryton; Melofon; Obój; Oktoban; Organ; Fortepian; Trąbka piccolo; Rototom; Saksofon; Werbel; Suzafon; Syntezator; Róg tenorowy; Saksofon tenorowy; Timbalesa; Tom-tom; Puzon; Trąbka; Tuba; Ukulele; Altówka; Skrzypce; Tuba Wagnera; Ksylofon; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Združljivo glasbilo: Harmonika; Akustična kitara; Altovski rog; Altovski saksofon; Bendžo; Baritonski rog; Baritonski saksofon; Bas boben; Bas kitara; Bas pozavna; Fagot; Bongo; Bugle; Violončelo; Klarinet; Conga boben; Kornet; Kravji zvonec; Činele; Digitalno pihalo; Kontrabas; Boben; Električna kitara; Evfonij; Talni tom; Flugel rog; Flavta; Francoski rog; Gong boben; Kitara; Ročni zvonec; Harmonika; Harfa; Klaviatura; Mandolina; Koračni bariton; Melofon; Oboa; Octoban; Orgle; Klavir; Piccolo trobenta; Rototom; Saksofon; Mali boben; Suzafon; Sintetizator; Tenorski rog; Tenorski saksofon; Timbale; Tom-tom; Pozavna; Trobenta; Tuba; Ukulele; Viola; Violina; Wagnerjeva tuba; Ksilofon; Drugo
th: เครื่องดนตรีที่เข้ากันได้: หีบเพลงชัก; กีตาร์โปร่ง; แตรอัลโต; อัลโตแซกโซโฟน; แบนโจ; แตรบาริโทน; บาริโทนแซกโซโฟน; กลองใหญ่; กีตาร์เบส; เบสทรอมโบน; บาสซูน; บองโก; แตรเดี่ยว; เชลโล; คลาริเน็ต; กลองคองก้า; คอร์เน็ต; คาวเบล; ฉาบ; เครื่องเป่าดิจิทัล; ดับเบิลเบส; กลอง; กีตาร์ไฟฟ้า; ยูโฟเนียม; ฟลอร์ทอม; ฟลูเกิลฮอร์น; ฟลูต; เฟรนช์ฮอร์น; กลองใหญ่ฆ้อง; กีตาร์; กระดิ่งมือ; ฮาร์โมนิก้า; ฮาร์ป; คีย์บอร์ด; แมนโดลิน; บาริโทนเดินแถว; เมลโลโฟน; โอโบ; อ็อคโตบาน; ออร์แกน; เปียโน; ปิกโคโลทรัมเป็ต; โรโตทอม; แซกโซโฟน; กลองสแนร์; ซูซาโฟน; ซินธิไซเซอร์; เทเนอร์ฮอร์น; เทเนอร์แซกโซโฟน; กลองทิมบาเลส; กลองทอม; ทรอมโบน; Trumpet; ทูบา; อูคูเลเล่; วิโอลา; ไวโอลิน; วากเนอร์ทูบา; ไซโลโฟน; อื่นๆ